Georgia statutes. 
It is declared to be the intention of the General Assembly that the provisions of this chapter are general laws within the meaning of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV(a) of the Constitution. No local or special laws shall be enacted on subject matters over which municipal corporations are authorized to act pursuant to this chapter. Any provision of any municipal charter heretofore enacted covering subject matters over which municipal corporations are authorized to act pursuant to this chapter shall be amended, modified, superseded, or repealed only in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 36-35-3.

History

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 820, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 95, 163 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 139, 142, 150 et seq.

36-35-8. Effect of conflict with Chapter 34.

Statute text

In the event of a conflict between this chapter and Chapter 34 of this title, this chapter shall control.

——————————

CHAPTER 36

ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-36-1. Applicability of article.

36-36-2. Effective date of annexation.

36-36-3. Report identifying annexed property; maps and surveys; technical assistance to municipalities; preclearance.

36-36-4. Creation of unincorporated islands prohibited; authorization to provide services or functions.

36-36-5. Restriction on annexation of unincorporated islands [Repealed].

36-36-6. Notice by municipal governing authority to county governing authority of proposed annexation.

36-36-7. Effect of annexation upon county owned property or facilities; notice; acquisition of property or facilities by municipality.

36-36-8. Effect of annexation upon utility service agreements.

36-36-9. Notice to be sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested.

36-36-10. Legislative intent.

36-36-11. Effect of objection to land use following rezoning; minimum procedures for addressing issues.

Article 1A

Annexation by Local Act of the General Assembly.

36-36-15. "Used for residential purposes" defined.

36-36-16. Procedures for annexation; referendum.

Article 2

Annexation Pursuant to Application

by 100 Percent of

Landowners.

36-36-20. "Contiguous area" defined.

36-36-21. Annexation upon application of all land owners; filing of identification of annexed property with Department of Community Affairs and county governing authority; effect of annexation.

36-36-22. Deannexation; authority; procedures; identification; status of lands.

36-36-23. Annexation by a municipal corporation into an adjoining county.

Article 3

Annexation Pursuant to Application

by Owners of 60 Percent of Land

and 60 Percent of Electors.

36-36-30. "Municipal corporation" defined.

36-36-31. "Contiguous area" defined; determination of aggregate external boundary.

36-36-32. Annexation upon application of owners of 60 percent of the land and 60 percent of the resident electors generally; application and signature requirements.

36-36-33. Annexation across county boundary lines prohibited.

36-36-34. Determination of compliance with article; notice upon noncompliance; proceedings upon compliance.

36-36-35. Plans and report for extension of services to area proposed to be annexed.

36-36-36. Requirement of public hearing; notice of time and place; persons entitled to be heard; right of property owner to withdraw consent.

36-36-37. Adoption of annexing ordinance.

36-36-38. Filing of identification of annexed property with county and Department of Community Affairs; applicability of municipal ad valorem taxes to annexed territory; effect of annexation.

36-36-39. Filing of petition for declaratory judgment to determine validity of annexation; judicial review.

36-36-40. Use of municipally owned utilities by residents of annexed territory.

Article 4

Annexation Pursuant to Resolution and Referendum.

36-36-50. Purpose of article.

36-36-51. Legislative declaration of policy.

36-36-52. Definitions.

36-36-53. Authorization of annexation generally.

36-36-54. Standards and requirements for area proposed to be annexed.

36-36-55. Determination of compliance with standards and requirements; review of determination by superior court.

36-36-56. Plans and report for extension of services to area proposed to be annexed.

36-36-57. Adoption of annexation resolution by municipal corporation; contents of resolutions; approval, availability, and distribution of report relating to extension of services; conduct of public hearing.

36-36-58. Referendum for ratification or rejection of annexation resolution generally; procedure; subsequent annexation attempt.

36-36-59. Filing of identification of annexed territory with Department of Community Affairs and county governing authority.

36-36-60. Authorized expenditures relating to annexation.

36-36-61. Restriction on applicability of article.

Article 5

Limitation on Annexation of Areas

Furnished Services or Included

in Comprehensive Zoning Plan

by Certain Counties.

36-36-70. Approval by governing authority in certain counties for annexation of areas furnished services or included in comprehensive zoning plan; right of property owners to file action for injunction [Repealed].

Article 6

Annexation of Unincorporated Islands.

36-36-90. Definitions.

36-36-91. Area included in determining aggregate external boundary.

36-36-92. Annexation of unincorporated islands; procedures; provision of municipal services.

Article 7

Procedure for Resolving Annexation Disputes.

36-36-110. Applicability.

36-36-111. Notice of annexation.

36-36-112. Prohibition on a change in zoning or land use.

36-36-113. Objection to annexation; grounds and procedures.

36-36-114. Arbitration panel; composition and membership.

36-36-115. Meetings of arbitration panel; duties; findings and recommendations; compensation.

36-36-116. Appeal.

36-36-117. Annexation after conclusion of procedures; remedies for violations of conditions.

36-36-118. Abandonment of proposed annexation; remedies for violations of conditions.

36-36-119. Good faith negotiations; written agreement governing terms of annexation.

Annotations

Cross references. - Assignment of annexed areas to retail electric suppliers, § 46-3-7.

Law reviews. - For article tracing the history of municipal annexation, and the General Assembly's role therein, see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 35 (1967). For article discussing the evolution of municipal annexation law in Georgia in light of Plantation Pipe Line Co. v. City of Bremen, 227 Ga. 1, 178 S.E.2d 868 (1970), see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 499 (1971). For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982). For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For article, "Lawyers Who Represent Local Governments," see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 58 (1987). For article, "Municipal De-Annexation: The Ins and the Outs," see 27 Ga. St. B. J. 118 (1991). For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

For note, "Annexation by Municipalities in Georgia," see 2 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (1951).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Proper remedy or procedure for attacking legality of proceedings annexing territory to municipal corporation, 18 A.L.R.2d 1255.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Annotations

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

36-36-1. Applicability of article.

Statute text

The procedures set forth in this article shall apply to all annexations pursuant to this chapter and to annexation by local Act of the General Assembly.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

36-36-2. Effective date of annexation.

Statute text

(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, all annexation other than by local Act shall become effective for ad valorem tax purposes on December 31 of the year during which such annexation occurred and for all other purposes shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month during which the requirements of Article 2, 3, or 4 of this chapter, whichever is applicable, have been met.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, annexation by local Act shall become effective for ad valorem tax purposes on December 31 of the year in which such local Act is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval and for all other purposes shall become effective at the time such local Act becomes effective or such later date as provided in such local Act.

(c) (1) Where an independent school system exists within the boundaries of a municipality, other effective dates may be established by the municipality solely for the purpose of determining school enrollment.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing by a county governing authority and the municipal governing authority, where property zoned and used for commercial purposes is annexed into a municipality with an independent school system, the effective date for the purposes of ad valorem taxes levied for educational purposes shall be December 31 of the year after the year in which the requirements of Article 2, 3, or 4 of this chapter, whichever is applicable, have been met.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 192, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 856, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 16.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004.'"

Law reviews. - For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 226 (2004).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Annexations properly invalidated. - Judgment invalidating the City of Atlanta's attempted annexation of five areas was affirmed because the trial court correctly held that the annexations were invalid since at the time the annexations would have become effective, the areas in question were already part of the newly incorporated City of South Fulton and, thus, ineligible for annexation by Atlanta. City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Municipal government may not create rules that make annexations effective prior to the time annexations are made effective by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-2. 1998 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U98-1.

36-36-3. Report identifying annexed property; maps and surveys; technical assistance to municipalities; preclearance.

Statute text

(a) The clerk, city attorney, or other person designated by the governing authority of any municipality annexing property shall file a report identifying any property annexed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the county governing authority of the county in which the property being annexed is located. Such reports shall be filed, at a minimum, not more than 30 days following the last day of the quarter in which the annexation becomes effective but may be filed more frequently. Each report shall include the following:

(1) The legal authority under which the annexation was accomplished, which shall be the ordinance or resolution number for any annexation effected pursuant to Article 2, 3, 4, or 6 of this chapter or the Act number if effected by local Act of the General Assembly;

(2) The name of the county in which the property being annexed is located; the total acreage annexed; the enactment date and effective date of the annexation ordinance, resolution, or local Act of the General Assembly;

(3) A letter from the governing authority of any municipality annexing property stating its intent to add the annexed area to maps provided by the United States Bureau of the Census during their next regularly scheduled boundary and annexation survey of the municipality and stating that the survey and map will be completed as instructed and returned to the United States Bureau of the Census; and

(4) A list identifying roadways, bridges, and rights of way on state routes that are annexed and, if necessary, the total mileage annexed.

(b) The submission of a report required under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made in writing and may also be made in electronic format to the Department of Community Affairs and to others as required, at the discretion of the submitting municipality.

(c) (1) The Department of Community Affairs shall notify the clerk, city attorney, or other person designated by the governing authority of the annexing municipality within 30 days after receipt of a report submitted under subsection (a) of this Code section if it determines the submission to be incomplete. The annexing municipality shall file a corrected report with the department and the county governing authority where the annexed property is located within 45 days from the date of the notice of any deficiency.

(2) No annexed area shall be added to the state map until such report has been properly submitted to the Department of Community Affairs. The Department of Community Affairs shall not provide a certification of annexation to the United States Census Bureau unless the governing authority of the annexing municipality has filed a completed report as required under subsection (a) of this Code section.

(3) Compliance with the requirements of this Code section shall be construed to be merely ancillary to and not an integral part of the annexation procedure such that an annexation shall, if otherwise authorized by law, become effective even though required filings under this Code section are temporarily delayed.

(d) The Department of Community Affairs may provide technical assistance to any municipality with respect to the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.

(e) The Department of Community Affairs shall maintain the annexation reports submitted to it pursuant to this Code section for two years. Annexation reports shall be subject to disclosure and inspection under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 while maintained in the possession of the Department of Community Affairs. Two years after receipt of an annexation report from a municipality, the Department of Community Affairs shall transfer possession of such report to the Division of Archives and History for permanent retention.

(f) Reserved.

(g) The governing authority of any municipality annexing property shall add all annexed areas to maps provided by the United States Census Bureau during the next regularly scheduled boundary and annexation survey of the municipality, complete the survey and map as instructed, and return them to the United States Census Bureau within the time frame requested.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 811, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, § 7; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 10/HB 137; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 6-4/HB 252.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.'"

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Data and mapping specifications, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Minimum Standards and Procedures, Standards and Procedures for Regional Planning "Regional Planning Requirements," Sec. 110-12-6-.05.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

36-36-4. Creation of unincorporated islands prohibited; authorization to provide services or functions.

Statute text

(a) The creation of unincorporated islands as described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection shall be prohibited:

(1) Annexation or deannexation which would result in the creation of an unincorporated area with its aggregate external boundaries abutting the annexing municipality;

(2) Annexation or deannexation which would result in the creation of an unincorporated area with its aggregate external boundaries abutting any combination of the annexing municipality and one or more other municipalities; or

(3) Annexation or deannexation which would result in the creation of an unincorporated area to which the county would have no reasonable means of physical access for the provision of services otherwise provided by the county governing authority solely to the unincorporated area of the county.

(b) When requested by resolution of the county governing authority, a municipality is authorized to provide any service or exercise any function within an unincorporated island. Such authority shall be in addition to any other authority of the municipality to provide extraterritorial services or functions. For purposes of this subsection, "unincorporated island" shall have the same meaning as contained in paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-36-90.

(c) The prohibition contained in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to a local Act providing for deannexation of territory from a municipality that would create an unincorporated island where another local Act annexing the same territory into another municipality takes effect on the same date as the local Act providing for deannexation of such territory.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1345, § 1/HB 432.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "subsection" was substituted for "Code section" in subsection (a), and "subsection" was substituted for "subparagraph" in subsection (b).

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Annexation not improper. - Strip of land excepted from annexation by a city was excepted not in an effort to evade the "entire parcel" requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20(a)(2), but to annex the property without creating an unincorporated island in violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-4(a); there was no showing that the landowner subdivided the property to evade the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20(a)(2), and the appellate court affirmed a trial court's refusal to enter a judgment declaring that a city's annexation was null and void, declining to reach a finding that would, in effect, have left the landowner no way of having the landowner's property annexed. Fayette County v. Steele, 268 Ga. App. 13, 601 S.E.2d 403 (2004).

By annexing a portion of a larger unincorporated area that was already qualified as an "unincorporated island," a city did not "create" a newly-formed unincorporated island in violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-4(a)(1), but simply reduced the size of a previously-existing island. Calloway v. City of Fayetteville, 296 Ga. App. 200, 674 S.E.2d 66 (2009).

Annexation challenge rendered moot by city's annexation of additional property. - Taxpayer's challenge to a city's 2007 annexation of property based on the creation of an illegal unincorporated island within the new municipal boundaries, in violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-4, was moot under O.C.G.A. § 5-6-48(b)(3) because the city later remedied the violation by also annexing the unincorporated island. Scarbrough Group v. Worley, 290 Ga. 234, 719 S.E.2d 430 (2011).

36-36-5. Restriction on annexation of unincorporated islands.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 3, effective March 17, 2000.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Code 1981, § 36-36-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.

36-36-6. Notice by municipal governing authority to county governing authority of proposed annexation.

Statute text

Upon accepting an application for annexation pursuant to Code Section 36-36-21 or a petition for annexation pursuant to Code Section 36-36-32, or upon adopting a resolution calling for an annexation referendum pursuant to Code Section 36-36-57, the governing authority of the annexing municipality shall within five business days give written notice of the proposed annexation to the governing authority of the county wherein the area proposed for annexation is located. Such notice shall include a map or other description of the site proposed to be annexed sufficient to identify the area. Where the proposed annexation is to be effected by a local Act of the General Assembly, a copy of the proposed legislation shall be provided by the governing authority of the municipality to the governing authority of the county in which the property proposed to be annexed is located following the receipt of such notice by the governing authority of the municipality under subsection (b) of Code Section 28-1-14.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 17.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004.'"

Law reviews. - For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 226 (2004).

36-36-7. Effect of annexation upon county owned property or facilities; notice; acquisition of property or facilities by municipality.

Statute text

(a) Upon receiving notice of a proposed annexation pursuant to Code Section 36-36-6, the county governing authority shall notify the governing authority of the municipality within five business days of receipt of such notice if any county owned public facilities are located in the area proposed to be annexed.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, ownership and control of county owned public properties and facilities are not diminished or otherwise affected by annexation of the area in which the county owned public property or facility is located.

(c) Whenever a municipality annexes land on both sides of a county road right of way, the annexing municipality shall assume the ownership, control, care, and maintenance of such right of way unless the municipality and the county agree otherwise by joint resolution.

(d) Whenever county owned property or a county owned facility within an area annexed by a municipality is no longer usable for service to the unincorporated area of the county as a result of the annexation, the annexing municipality shall be required to acquire said property from the county governing authority under the following conditions:

(1) The annexation must be final;

(2) The county property or facility must be funded by revenues derived from the unincorporated areas of the county and must be used to provide services solely to the unincorporated areas of the county;

(3) The county adopts a resolution declaring that the property or facility is no longer usable for service to the unincorporated area of the county as a result of the annexation; and

(4) Unless otherwise provided by mutual agreement, the county shall be compensated in an amount equal to the fair market value of the property or facility which is no longer usable for service to the unincorporated area. If the county and municipality fail to agree as to the fair market value of the property or facility within 180 days following adoption of the resolution required by paragraph (3) of this subsection, the question of fair market value shall be submitted to a special master appointed by the superior court of the county in which the property or facility is located for determination of value.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "of this subsection" was inserted in the last sentence of paragraph (d)(4).

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For annual survey on real property, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 151 (2014).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Construction with O.C.G.A. § 36-34-5. - In a dispute concerning a city's desire to access water lines owned by a county but located in an area annexed by the city, it was determined, upon discerning the interplay between O.C.G.A. §§ 36-34-5 and 36-36-7(b), that the city was not permitted access to the line in question absent compliance with one of the three methods enumerated in O.C.G.A. § 36-34-5, namely by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain. Cobb County v. City of Smyrna, 270 Ga. App. 471, 606 S.E.2d 667 (2004).

Statute did not encompass easements owned by the county within city limits. - O.C.G.A. § 36-36-7, providing for the automatic transfer of ownership of roads and rights of way from counties to new municipalities, does not encompass property interests generally and did not operate to transfer detention pond easements owned by Fulton County to the City of Sandy Springs when the city incorporated; therefore, the county was required to maintain the ponds as long as the county owned the easements. Fulton County v. City of Sandy Springs, 295 Ga. 16, 757 S.E.2d 123 (2014).

36-36-8. Effect of annexation upon utility service agreements.

Statute text

No annexation shall invalidate any utility service agreement between a county and an annexing municipality in effect on July 1, 1992, except by mutual written consent.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "July 1, 1992" was substituted for "the effective date of this chapter".

36-36-9. Notice to be sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested.

Statute text

All notices to a municipal or county governing authority required pursuant to this chapter shall be sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

36-36-10. Legislative intent.

Statute text

It is the express intent of the General Assembly in enacting the provisions of this chapter to provide for alternative methods for annexing or deannexing an area or areas into or from the corporate limits of a municipality. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, no provision of this chapter relating to annexation or deannexation by any such alternate method is intended to or shall be construed to in any way restrict, limit, or otherwise impair the authority of the General Assembly to annex or deannex by local Act.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 540, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Provisions of former O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-11 and 36-70-24(4)(c), pertaining to the establishment of a dispute resolution process when a bona fide land use dispute arises between a city and county over the use of land which is the subject of annexation, do not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. IV. Higdon v. City of Senoia, 273 Ga. 83, 538 S.E.2d 39 (2000)(decided prior to 2004 amendment of O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-11 and 36-70-24.)

Authority of municipality to annex during referendum process. - Trial court properly held that a municipality did not have the authority under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21 to annex land that the Georgia General Assembly designated for annexation to another municipality, subject to a referendum, before the referendum took place; thus, a city was prohibited from attempting to annex property during the referendum process. City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

Municipality without authority to annex land during referendum process. - Municipality does not have the authority pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21 to annex land that the Georgia General Assembly has designated for annexation to another municipality, subject to a referendum, before the referendum takes place. City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

Georgia General Assembly did not intend the alternative methods of annexation under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-10 to establish a system for municipalities to race the legislature to annex land that it already had designated for annexation under local law. City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

Cited in City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

36-36-11. Effect of objection to land use following rezoning; minimum procedures for addressing issues.

Statute text

(a) The intent of this Code section is to provide a mechanism to resolve disputes over land use arising out of the rezoning of property to a more intense land use in conjunction with or subsequent to annexation in order to facilitate coordinated planning between counties and municipalities particularly with respect to areas contiguous to municipal boundaries; provided, however, that on and after September 1, 2007, such dispute resolutions shall be governed by the provisions of Article 7 of this chapter and the provisions of this Code section shall be limited to proceedings initiated prior to such date.

(b) As used in this Code section, the term "objection" means an objection to a proposed change in land use which results in a substantial change in the intensity of the allowable use of the property or a change to a significantly different allowable use.

(c) (1) When an initial zoning of property is sought pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 36-66-4 or when the rezoning of annexed property is sought within one year of the effective date of the annexation, the municipal corporation shall give notice to the county governing authority within seven calendar days of the filing of the application for initial zoning or rezoning. Upon receipt of such notice, the county governing authority shall have seven calendar days to notify the municipality in writing of its intent to raise an objection to the proposed zoning or rezoning of the property and shall specify the basis for the objection. If the county governing authority serves notice of its intent to object, then the county governing authority shall have ten calendar days from the date of the county's notice to document in writing the nature of the objection specifically identifying the basis for the objection including any increased service delivery or infrastructure costs. The absence of a written notice of intent to object or failure to document the nature of the objection shall mean the municipal corporation may proceed with the zoning or rezoning and no subsequent objections under this process may be filed for the zoning or rezoning under consideration.

(2) Commencing with the date of receipt by the municipality of the county's documented objections, representatives of the municipal corporation and the county shall have 21 calendar days to devise mitigating measures to address the county's specific objections to the proposed zoning or rezoning. The governing authority of the municipal corporation and the governing authority of the county may agree on mitigating measures or agree in writing to waive the objections at any time within the 21 calendar day period, in which event the municipal corporation may proceed with the zoning or rezoning in accordance with such agreement; or, where an initial zoning is proposed concurrent with annexation, the municipality may approve, deny, or abandon the annexation of all or parts of the property under review.

(3) If the representatives of the municipal corporation and the county fail to reach agreement on the objections and mitigating measures within the 21 calendar day period, either the governing authority of the municipal corporation or the governing authority of the county may insist upon appointment of a mediator within seven calendar days after the end of the 21 day period to assist in resolving the dispute. The mediator shall be mutually selected and appointed within seven calendar days of either party's timely, written insistence on a mediator. The party insisting on use of the mediator shall bear two-thirds of the expense of the mediation and the other party shall bear one-third of the expense of the mediation. If both the municipality and the county insist on mediation, the expenses of mediation shall be shared equally. The mediator shall have up to 28 calendar days to meet with the parties to develop alternatives to resolve the objections. If the municipal corporation and the county agree on alternatives to resolve the objections, the municipal corporation may proceed in accordance with the mediated agreement.

(4) If the objections are not resolved by the end of the 28 day period, the municipal governing authority or the county governing authority may, no later than seven calendar days after the conclusion of such 28 day period, request review by a citizen review panel. The citizen review panel shall be an independent body comprised of one resident of the municipal corporation appointed by the municipal governing authority, one resident of the county appointed by the county governing authority, and one nonresident of the county who is a land use planning professional mutually selected by the municipal and county appointees to the citizen review panel. No elected or appointed officials or employees, contractors, or vendors of a municipality or county may serve on the citizen review panel. If a request for review by a citizen review panel is made, the mediator shall make arrangements to appear personally at the first meeting of the panel and brief the panel members regarding the objections and proposed mitigating measures or provide a written presentation of such objections and proposed mitigating measures to the panel members on or before the date of such first meeting, whichever the mediator deems appropriate. The citizen review panel shall meet at least once but may conduct as many meetings as necessary to complete its review within a 21 calendar day period. All meetings of the citizen review panel shall be open to the public pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 50. Within 21 calendar days of the request for review, the citizen review panel shall complete its review of the evidence submitted by the county and the municipality concerning the objections and proposed mitigating measures and shall issue its own recommendations.

(5) The citizen review panel shall recommend approval or denial of the zoning or rezoning and address the objections and proposed mitigating measures. Where an initial zoning is proposed concurrent with annexation, the panel may also recommend that the annexation be approved or abandoned. The findings and recommendations of the citizen review panel shall not be binding.

(6) Following receipt of the recommendations of the citizen review panel, the municipal corporation may:

(A) Zone or rezone all or parts of the property under review;

(B) Zone or rezone all or parts of the property under review with mitigating measures;

(C) Deny the zoning or rezoning of all or parts of the property under review; or

(D) Any combination of the foregoing.

Where an initial zoning is proposed concurrent with annexation, the municipality may also approve, deny, or abandon the annexation of all or parts of the property under review.

(7) At any time during the process set forth in this Code section, the county or municipality may file a petition in superior court seeking sanctions against a party for any objections or proposed mitigating measures that lack substantial justification or that were interposed for purposes of delay or harassment. Such petition shall be assigned to a judge, pursuant to Code Section 15-1-9.1 or 15-6-13, who is not a judge in the circuit in which the county is located. The judge selected may also be a senior judge pursuant to Code Section 15-1-9.2 who resides in another circuit. The visiting or senior judge shall determine whether any objections or proposed mitigating measures lack substantial justification or were interposed for delay or harassment and shall assess against the party raising such objection or proposing or objecting to such mitigating measures the full cost of attorney fees and other costs incurred by the other party in responding to the objections or proposed mitigating measures.

(8) Unless otherwise agreed, a zoning or rezoning decision made pursuant to this Code section shall not be effective until 28 calendar days following the completion of the process authorized by this Code section and the zoning or rezoning vote by the municipal governing authority.

(9) During the process set forth in this Code section, the municipal corporation may proceed with notice, hearings, and other requirements for zoning or rezoning in accordance with the municipality's zoning ordinance.

(d) If the annexation, zoning, or rezoning is denied or abandoned based in whole or in part on the county's objections, the county shall not zone or rezone the property or allow any use of a similar or greater density or intensity to that proposed for the property which had been objected to by the county pursuant to this Code section for a one-year period after the denial or abandonment.

(e) The process set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section specifies minimum procedures for addressing objections. However, a county and a municipality may agree to additional procedures by resolution of the county and municipal governing authorities. Notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, any agreement to resolve county objections to a proposed land use of an area to be annexed into a municipality which agreement was in effect on January 1, 2004, and which includes a provision whereby the county and a municipality agree to be bound by the recommendations of an annexation appeals board shall remain in effect until the parties agree otherwise.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 856, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 18; Ga. L. 2007, p. 292, § 1/HB 2.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, paragraphs (1) through (9) of subsection (b) were redesignated as subsection (c), subsections (c) and (d) were redesignated as subsections (d) and (e), and "calendar" was substituted for "calender" in paragraph (c)(1).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004.'"

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008). For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 226 (2004). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS
